Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 30. Family-Oriented Enterprises

§ 57-30-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Approved participant” means a person, corporation or other entity issued a certificate by the Mississippi Development Authority under Section 57-30-3.

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

“Project” means any family-oriented entertainment enterprise such as campgrounds and theme parks, as designated by the Mississippi Development Authority, with an initial capital investment of not less than Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) in federal, local and/or private funds if located in a county in a Tier One area, as designated under Section 57-73-21, or with an initial capital investment of not less than Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) in federal, local and/or private funds if located in a county in a Tier Two area or Tier Three area as designated in Section 57-73-21. Whether a county is in a Tier One area, Tier Two area or Tier Three area shall be determined by the classification of the area at the time the initial investment is made. The term “project” also means any of the following ancillary businesses if located on the project site or within one (1) mile of the project and owned by the owner of the family-oriented entertainment enterprise or owned by an entity legally affiliated with the owner of the family-oriented entertainment enterprise: (i) auditoriums, (ii) dining facilities, (iii) gift shops, and (iv) lodging facilities. However, the capital investment in any such dining facility or lodging facility shall not be included for purposes of meeting the minimum capital investment requirement for a project. The term “project” does not mean any business, corporation or entity having a gaming license issued under Section 75-76-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, but may include a family-oriented entertainment enterprise owned by such a business, corporation or entity that is in excess of development that the State Gaming Commission requires for the issuance or renewal of a gaming license.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 616, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 549, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 580, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 27, 2004.).

§ 57-30-3.
Creation of Sales Tax Incentive Fund; incentive payments.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Sales Tax Incentive Fund,” into which shall be deposited such money as provided in Section 27-65-75(16). The monies in the fund shall be used for the purpose of making the incentive payments authorized in this section. The fund shall be administered by the MDA. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the General Fund, and any interest earned on or investment earnings on the amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. The MDA may use not more than one percent (1%) of interest earned or investment earnings, or both, on amounts in the fund for administration and management of the incentive program.

Subject to the provisions of this section, incentive payments may be made by the MDA to an approved participant that incurs indebtedness or incurs capital costs, or both, to locate a project in the state. The payments to an approved participant shall be for the amount of sales tax revenue collected on the gross proceeds of sales of a project, after making the diversions required in Section 27-65-75, except the diversion provided for in Section 27-65-75(1). The MDA shall ensure that payments made pursuant to this section are utilized to pay the debt service incurred by the approved participant for the project as approved by the MDA or any project capital cost incurred by the approved participant for the project as approved by the MDA, or both. The MDA shall make payments to an approved participant on a semiannual basis with payments being made in the months of January and July. For the purposes of determining the amount of indebtedness or project capital costs, or both, incurred for any ancillary business, as described in Section 57-30-1(c), which is eligible for incentive payments under this section, the amount of such indebtedness or project capital costs, or both, shall be limited to an amount not greater than the indebtedness or project capital costs, or both, incurred for the primary project. The aggregate amount that an approved participant may receive shall not exceed thirty-five percent (35%) of the portion of the original indebtedness that is funded from private sources or project capital cost that is funded from private sources, or both, incurred by such participant for the project. The MDA shall make the calculations necessary to make the payments provided for in this section. The MDA shall cease making incentive payments to an approved participant on the occurrence of the earlier of (i) the date thirty-five percent (35%) of the portion of the original indebtedness that is funded from private sources, or any refinancing of the portion of the original indebtedness that is funded from private sources, incurred for the project or the portion of the original project capital cost that is funded from private sources incurred for the project, or both, is satisfied, (ii) ten (10) years from the date the original indebtedness for the project was incurred, without regard to any refinancing or additional financing for any addition to or expansion of the project, or (iii) the project ceases operations.

At such time as payments are no longer required to be made to an approved participant, the MDA shall notify the State Tax Commission and the sales tax revenue collected from such project shall no longer be deposited into the Sales Tax Incentive Fund, and any amounts remaining in the fund that were collected from such participant shall be transferred to the State General Fund; however, if the project is located in a municipality, a portion of such amount shall be paid to such municipality in the same manner and amounts as provided for in Section 27-65-75(1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 616, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 549, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 580, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 27, 2004.).

§ 57-30-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms Laws of 2004, ch. 580, § 3 eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§57-30-5. [Laws, 2004, ch. 580, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 27, 2004.)]